Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.125

Foreign trade zones—Authority to apply for permission to establish, operate and maintain.

A county, as zone sponsor, may apply to the United States for permission to establish, operate, and maintain foreign trade zones: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent these zones from being operated and financed by a private corporation(s) on behalf of such county acting as zone sponsor.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 196 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 196: See note following RCW 24.46.010.